apertium-es-ast.es.dix
  <pardef n="arg/üir__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üiríamos</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üiría</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üiríais</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üirías</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üirían</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üiría</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üiremos</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üiré</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üiréis</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üirás</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üirán</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üirá</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyéremos</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyere</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyereis</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyeres</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyeren</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyere</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyendo</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyéndo</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabiéndo"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üimos</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üí</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üisteis</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üiste</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyeron</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyó</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üid</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üid</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabed"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üí</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__suscribí"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üíd</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabéd"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uye</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üir</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üir</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__saber"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üír</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabér"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üíamos</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üía</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üíais</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üías</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üían</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üía</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyéramos</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>uyésemos</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyera</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>uyese</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyerais</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>uyeseis</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyeras</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>uyeses</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyeran</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>uyesen</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyera</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>uyese</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üidas</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üida</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üidos</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üido</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>üido</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üimos</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyo</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>üís</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyes</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uyen</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uye</l>
        <r>üir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>

<e><i>arg</i><par n="arg/üir__vblex"/></e>
